it: Fotocamere/dispositivi ottici > Accessori ottici/fotocamere > Componenti e accessori per fotocamere > Cinghe per fotocamera: Cinghie per cintura; Cinghie per petto; Cinghie per mani; Cinghie per imbracatura; Cinghie per collo; Cinghie a sgancio rapido; Cinghie per spalle; Cinturini da polso
es: Cámaras y ópticas > Accesorios ópticos y de cámara > Accesorios y piezas para cámaras > Correas para cámaras: Correas de cinturón; Correas para el pecho; Correas de mano; Correas de arnés; Correas para el cuello; Correas de liberación rápida; Correas para el hombro; Muñequeras
sv: Kameror och optik > Tillbehör till kamera och optik > Kameratillbehör > Kameraremmar: Bältesremmar; Bröstremmar; Handremmar; Selremmar; Halsremmar; Snabbkopplingsremmar; Axelremmar; Handledsremmar
sk-SK: Fotoaparáty a optické zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre fotoaparáty a optické zariadenia > Diely a príslušenstvo pre fotoaparáty > Popruhy na fotoaparát: Pásové popruhy; Hrudné popruhy; Popruhy na ruky; Popruhy s postrojom; Popruhy na krk; Rýchlouvoľňovacie popruhy; Ramenné popruhy; Popruhy na zápästie
en: Cameras & Optics > Camera & Optic Accessories > Camera Parts & Accessories > Camera Straps: Belt Straps; Chest Straps; Hand Straps; Harness Straps; Neck Straps; Quick-Release Straps; Shoulder Straps; Wrist Straps
fi: Kamerat ja optiikka > Korut ja asusteet > Kameran osat ja tarvikkeet > Kamerahihnat: Vyöhihnat; Rintakehähihnat; Käsihihnat; Valjashihnat; Kaulahihnat; Pikavapautushihnat; Olkahihnat; Rannehihnat
ja: カメラ・光学機器 > カメラ・光学機器アクセサリー > カメラパーツ・アクセサリー > カメラストラップ: ベルトストラップ; チェストストラップ; ハンドストラップ; ハーネスストラップ; ネックストラップ; クイックリリースストラップ; ショルダーストラップ; リストストラップ
vi: Máy ảnh & Quang học > Phụ kiện camera và ống kính > Linh kiện & Phụ kiện máy ảnh > Dây đeo máy ảnh: Dây đai thắt lưng; Dây đai đeo ngực; Dây đeo tay; Dây đeo đai an toàn; Dây đeo cổ; Tháo lắp nhanh; Dây đeo vai; Dây đai cổ tay
nl: Camera's en optiek > Optische en camera-accessoires > Cameraonderdelen en -accessoires > Camerariemen: Overige riemen; Borstriemen; Handriemen; Harnasriemen; Nekriemen; Riemen met snelsluiting; Schouderriemen; Polsriemen
zh-TW: 相機和光學元件 > 相機和光學配件 > 相機零件/配件 > 相機背帶: 腰間帶; 胸背帶; 手帶; 綁帶; 頸掛繩; 快拆帶; 肩掛繩; 手腕綁帶
ko: 카메라/광학 기기 > 카메라/광학 기기 부대용품 > 카메라 부품/부대용품 > 카메라 스트랩: 벨트 스트랩; 가슴 스트랩; 손 스트랩; 하네스 스트랩; 넥 스트랩; 퀵 릴리스 스트랩; 어깨 스트랩; 손목 스트랩
th: กล้องและออปติก > อุปกรณ์กล้องและออปติก > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์กล้อง > สายคล้องสำหรับกล้อง: สายคาดเอว; สายคาดหน้าอก; สายรัดมือ; สายคล้องไหล่; สายรัดคอ; สายรัดแบบปลดเร็ว; สายสะพายไหล่; สายรัดข้อมือ
hu: Fényképezőgépek és optikák > Fényképezőgép- és optikai kiegészítők > Fényképezőgép-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Fényképezőgép-pántok: Övpántok; Mellkaspántok; Kézpántok; Hámpántok; Nyakpántok; Gyorskioldó pántok; Vállpántok; Csuklópántok
bg-BG: Фотоапарати и оптика > Аксесоари за фотоапарати и оптика > Части и аксесоари за фотоапарати > Ремъци за фотоапарат: Ремъци за колан; Ремъци за гърди; Ремъци за ръка; Ремъци за тяло; Ремъци за врат; Ремъци с бързо откопчаване; Ремъци за рамо; Ремъци за китка
ro-RO: Aparate foto și componente optice > Accesorii pentru aparate foto și componente optice > Piese și accesorii pentru aparate foto > Curele pentru aparate foto: Curele pentru centură; Curele pentru piept; Curele de mână; Curele ham; Curele pentru gât; Curele cu eliberare rapidă; Curele de umăr; Curele de încheietură
sl-SI: Fotoaparati in optika > Dodatki za fotoaparate in optiko > Deli in dodatki za fotoaparate > Trakovi za fotoaparate: Trakovi za pas za fotoaparate; Prsni trakovi za fotoaparate; Zapestni trakovi za fotoaparate; Trakovi za oprsnice; Trakovi za vrat; Trakovi s hitro sprostitvijo; Ramenski trakovi; Trakovi za zapestje
pt-BR: Câmeras e óptica > Câmera e acessórios ópticos > Acessórios e peças para câmeras > Alças para câmera: Correias de ombro; Correias de peito; Correias de mão; Correias de arnês; Alças de pescoço; Correias de liberação rápida; Alças de ombro; Correias de pulso
ru: Камеры и оптика > Аксессуары для камер и другой оптики > Детали и аксессуары для камер > Ремни для камер: Поясные ремни; Нагрудные ремни; Кистевые ремни; Ремни-разгрузки; Шейные ремни; Быстросъемные ремни; Плечевые ремни; Запястные ремни
tr: Kameralar ve Optik Malzemeler > Kamera ve Optik Aksesuarları > Fotoğraf Makinesi Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Fotoğraf Makinesi Kayışları: Kemer Kayışları; Göğüs Kayışları; El Kayışları; Koşum Kayışları; Boyun Askıları; Hızlı Açılan Kayışlar; Omuz Askıları; Bilek Kayışları
pt-PT: Câmaras e ótica > Acessórios de câmara e ótica > Peças e acessórios de câmara > Fitas de câmara: Faixas de cinto; Faixas de peito; Faixas de mão; Faixas de arnês; Correias de pescoço; Faixas de libertação rápida; Correias de ombro; Faixas de pulso
de: Kameras & Optik > Kamera- & Optisches Zubehör > Kamerazubehör > Kameragurte: Kameragurt; Brustgurte; Handschlaufen; Gurte; Halsriemen; Schnellverschlussgurte; Schulterriemen; Armschlaufen
lt-LT: Fotoaparatai ir optika > Fotoaparatų ir optikos priedai > Fotoaparatų dalys ir priedai > Fotoaparatų dirželiai: Juosmens dirželiai; Krūtinės dirželiai; Rankos dirželiai; Petnešų tipo dirželiai; Kaklo dirželiai; Greitai atsegami dirželiai; Peties dirželiai; Riešo dirželiai
el: Κάμερες & οπτικά συστήματα > Αξεσουάρ κάμερας & οπτικών συστημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά και αξεσουάρ κάμερας > Ιμάντες κάμερας: Ιμάντες ζώνης; Ιμάντες στήθους; Ιμάντες χειρός; Ιμάντες λουριών; Ιμάντες λαιμού; Ιμάντες γρήγορης αποδέσμευσης; Ιμάντες ώμου; Ιμάντες καρπού
da: Kameraer og optik > Kamera og optik – tilbehør > Kamera – reservedele og tilbehør > Kamera – stropper: Bæltestropper; Bryststropper; Håndstropper; Selestropper; Halsstropper; Hurtig-frigivelses-stropper; Skulderstropper; Håndledsstropper
cs: Foto, video a optika > Fotoaparáty, kamery a optika – příslušenství > Díly a příslušenství k fotoaparátům > Popruhy k fotoaparátům a kamerám: Držáky na opasek; Hrudní popruhy; Poutka na ruku; Postroje s popruhy; Popruhy na krk; Rychloupínací popruhy; Ramenní popruhy; Poutka na zápěstí
pl: Aparaty, kamery i przyrządy optyczne > Akcesoria do aparatów, kamer i przyrządów optycznych > Akcesoria i części do aparatów > Paski do aparatów i kamer: Paski zapinane; Pasy piersiowe; Paski na rękę; Paski uprzęży; Pasek na szyję; Paski szybkozłączne; Paski naramienne; Paski na nadgarstki
nb: Kameraer og optikk > Tilbehør for kameraer og optikk > Kameradeler og -tilbehør > Kamerastropper: Beltestropper; Bryststropper; Håndstropper; Selestropper; Nakkestropper; Stropper med hurtigfeste; Skulderstropper; Håndleddsstropper
hr-HR: Fotoaparati i optika > Dodaci za fotoaparate i optiku > Dijelovi i dodaci za fotoaparate > Trake za fotoaparate: Trake za remen; Trake za prsni remen; Trake za ruke; Trake za pojas; Trake za vrat; Trake za brzo otpuštanje; Trake za naramenice; Trake za ručni zglob
zh-CN: 相机与光学器件 > 相机与光学器件配件 > 相机零件/配件 > 相机背带: 背带; 胸带; 手带; 吊带; 颈带; 快速释放带; 肩带; 腕带
fr: Appareils photo, caméras et instruments d’optique > Accessoires pour appareils photo, caméras et instruments d’optique > Pièces et accessoires pour appareils photo et caméras > Sangles pour appareils photo: Sangles de ceinture; Sangles de poitrine; Sangles de main; Sangles de harnais; Sangles de cou; Sangles à dégagement rapide; Sangles d’épaule; Sangles de poignet